Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-621
New political party; candidates; filing fee; petition of nomination; signature verification; excess signatures.

When a new political party has been properly established under section 32-716 prior to the general election and after the primary election of the same year, all candidates except candidates for President or Vice President of the United States shall pay the filing fee as provided in section 32-608, file a candidate filing form with the filing officer as provided in section 32-607 no later than September 1 prior to the general election accompanied by a petition of nomination containing the names of not less than twenty-five registered voters of the political party obtained from the appropriate jurisdiction, and comply with the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act. The petition of nomination shall conform to the requirements of sections 32-617.01 and 32-628. If the filing officer verifies signatures in excess of one hundred ten percent of the number necessary to place the candidate upon the ballot, the filing officer may stop verifying signatures and consider the petition sufficient and valid.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 189;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 65;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 47.

Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act, see section 49-1401.

Certificate of nomination for a new party may be filed with Secretary of State. State ex rel. Beeson v. Marsh, 150 Neb. 233, 34 N.W.2d 279 (1948).

A new political party, formed after the time when it would have been possible for it to participate in the primary election, may participate in the general election. Morrissey v. Wait, 92 Neb. 271, 138 N.W. 186 (1912).